Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Safety

281.880.
Motor carrier safety management audit program — Safety inspections and ratings.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall establish a motor carrier safety management audit program applicable to private or for-hire, intrastate or interstate motor carriers.

The Department of Kentucky State Police may perform safety inspections on vehicles operated by a motor carrier on public highways and may enter onto property owned, leased, controlled, or operated by a motor carrier to inspect any of its vehicles or inspect or copy records relating to vehicle safety, maintenance, or financial responsibility.

The Department of Kentucky State Police may issue motor carrier safety ratings to any private or for-hire motor carrier which is based in Kentucky, has a terminal in Kentucky, or operates consistently in Kentucky. The safety rating scale and factors determining a carrier’s safety rating shall be established by administrative regulation and shall be compatible with the scale and factors established by the Federal Highway Administration in Title 49 of the United States Code of Federal Regulations, Part 385, relating to safety ratings, in effect as of July 13, 1990, or as amended after that date.

The Department of Kentucky State Police may determine the safety fitness of a motor carrier and may require the maintenance of or upgrade to a satisfactory safety rating.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 466, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 85, § 284, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 75, § 18, effective June 25, 2009.

281.883.
Administrative penalties — Administrative regulations.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall by administrative regulation establish a system of administrative penalties for safety violations. These penalties shall be compatible with those set forth in United States Code Title 49, Section 521(b), as amended, and any federal regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall by administrative regulation provide an administrative process for appealing a citation of a safety violation or the penalty imposed because of the violation.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish a procedure for administrative citation, assessment, and appeal of the penalties in KRS

281.990

for any violation of the provisions of this chapter, or any order, rule, or administrative regulation lawfully issued pursuant to authority granted by this chapter. Any hearing pursuant to this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 466, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 75, § 19, effective June 25, 2009; 2015 ch. 19, § 32, effective June 24, 2015.

281.888.
Cooperative agreement authorized.

The Transportation Cabinet may enter into a cooperative agreement with the Federal Highway Administration to enforce the safety laws and regulations of Kentucky and the United States concerning motor carrier transportation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 466, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.